incubator/apertium-en-sq/apertium-en-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="gr/ua__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uaje</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uas</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uaje</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uas</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ua</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uan</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ua</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uaja</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ash</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atë</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atë</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="Mal/i_i_Zi__np"> <!--FIXME: Check this-->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i<b/>i<b/>Zi</l>
          <r>i<b/>i<b/>Zi<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>i<b/>Zi</l>
          <r>i<b/>i<b/>Zi<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i<b/>i<b/>Zi</l>
          <r>i<b/>i<b/>Zi<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i<b/>i<b/>Zi</l>
          <r>i<b/>i<b/>Zi<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i<b/>i<b/>Zi</l>
          <r>i<b/>i<b/>Zi<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in<b/>e<b/>Zi</l>
          <r>i<b/>i<b/>Zi<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it<b/>të<b/>Zi</l>
          <r>i<b/>i<b/>Zi<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it<b/>të<b/>Zi</l>
          <r>i<b/>i<b/>Zi<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Shqipëri__np"> <!-- FIXME: Check this -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>së</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>në</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>së</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Kosov/ë__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ë<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ë<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ës</l>
          <r>ë<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ën</l>
          <r>ë<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ës</l>
          <r>ë<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="r/i__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inj</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gjith/ë__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r>ë<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ë<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="v/ogël__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogël</l>
          <r>ogël<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>egjël</l>
          <r>ogël<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogële</l>
          <r>ogël<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ri"><i>r</i><par n="r/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zi"><i>z</i><par n="r/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gjithë"><i>gjith</i><par n="gjith/ë__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vogël"><i>v</i><par n="v/ogël__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Kosovë"><i>Kosov</i><par n="Kosov/ë__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Shqipëri"><i>Shqipëri</i><par n="Shqipëri__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Serbi"><i>Serbi</i><par n="Shqipëri__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maqedoni"><i>Maqedoni</i><par n="Shqipëri__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mali e Zi"><i>Mal</i><par n="Mal/i_i_Zi__np"/></e>
    <e lm="grua"><i>gr</i><par n="gr/ua__n_f"/></e>
